Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
F

RANKLIN D. ROOSEVELT WARM SPRINGS MEMORIAL

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (see Ga. L. 1982, p. 1323), the General Assembly designated the Roosevelt Warm Springs Institute for Rehabilitation as a living memorial to President Franklin Delano Roosevelt and requested congressional and presidential acknowledgment and acceptance of the institute as a living memorial.

12-3-150. Duty of department to administer and maintain memorial.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Natural Resources to proceed with the making and developing of plans for, administering, and maintaining a memorial in the vicinity of Warm Springs, Georgia, to perpetuate the memory of the late Franklin D. Roosevelt.

(Ga. L. 1946, p. 31, § 2.)

12-3-151. Powers of department.

The department shall have the following powers:

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for accomplishing the purposes of the department under this part;

To accept donations, grants, and subsidies from any source and use them in purchasing and improving such property as the department may deem necessary to effectuate its aims and purposes under this part;

To employ special talent, advertise, and provide such recreational facilities as it may deem necessary and advisable;

To acquire in the name of the state by donation or by purchase any real property or interest in real property in compliance with Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 50, the "State Properties Code."

To make contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the purposes expressed in this part, including contracts for construction of such memorial and improvements thereto;

To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage self-liquidating projects or concessions to be located on property owned by the department;

To accept loans or grants of money, materials, or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development or any similar agency, or from any state or any political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof, and such loan or grant shall be upon such terms and conditions as the lending or granting body may impose;

To fix and recommend from time to time fees, rentals, and other charges for the use of the facilities and services furnished by the department; to charge and collect them; and to lease and to make contracts with any person with respect to the use of any facility or part thereof;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressed in this part.

(Ga. L. 1946, p. 31, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1039, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 593, § 1.)

12-3-152. Franklin D. Roosevelt Warm Springs Memorial Advisory Committee created; composition; duties of committee; officers; quorum; reimbursement for expenses; appointment of successors; terms of members.

There is created the Franklin D. Roosevelt Warm Springs Memorial Advisory Committee. The members of the committee shall consist of the members of the heretofore existing Franklin D. Roosevelt Warm Springs Memorial Commission in office on May 1, 1981, each of whom shall serve for the unexpired portion of his respective office on the commission.

The committee shall consult with and advise the Governor, the Board of Natural Resources, and the department concerning the execution of the functions conferred on the department by this part.

The committee shall elect one of its members as chairman and another as vice-chairman and shall also elect a secretary and treasurer, who need not be members of the committee.

A majority of the committee shall constitute a quorum.

No member of the committee shall be entitled to compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed from state funds for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier, at the legal mileage rate for use of a personal automobile, and the actual cost of lodging and meals while away from his office on official state business.

As the terms of office of members expire, successors shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of seven years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 593, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 849, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12.)

Cross references.

- Legal mileage allowance,

§

50-19-7

.

12-3-153. Construction of part.

This part shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

(Ga. L. 1946, p. 31, § 4.)